Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 3. Probation and Suspension of Sentence

Applied

in

Reese v. State, 866 P.2d 82,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of probation condition exposing defendant to public shame or ridicule, 65 ALR5th 187.

Propriety, in criminal case, of federal district court order restricting defendant's right to re-enter or stay in United States, 94 ALR Fed 619.

24 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 1549 to 1568; 67A C.J.S. Pardons §§ 39 to 83.

§ 7-13-301.
Placing person found guilty, but not convicted, on probation.

If a person who has not previously been convicted of any felony is charged with or is found guilty of or pleads guilty or no contest to any misdemeanor except any second or subsequent violation of W.S.

31-5-233

or any similar provision of law, or any second or subsequent violation of W.S. 6-2-510(a) or 6-2-511(a) or any similar provision of law, or any felony except murder, sexual assault in the first or second degree, aggravated assault and battery or arson in the first or second degree, the court may, with the consent of the defendant and the state and without entering a judgment of guilt or conviction, defer further proceedings and place the person on probation for a term not to exceed thirty-six (36) months upon terms and conditions set by the court. The terms of probation shall include that he:

Report to the court not less than twice in each year at times and places fixed in the order;

Conduct himself in a law-abiding manner;

Not leave the state without the consent of the court;

Conform his conduct to any other terms of probation the court finds proper; and

Pay restitution to each victim in accordance with W.S.

7-9-101

and

7-9-103

through

7-9-115

.

If the court finds the person has fulfilled the terms of probation and that his rehabilitation has been attained to the satisfaction of the court, the court may at the end of thirty-six (36) months, or at any time after the expiration of one (1) year from the date of the original probation, discharge the person and dismiss the proceedings against him.

If the defendant violates a term or condition of probation at any time before final discharge, the court may:

Enter an adjudication of guilt and conviction and proceed to impose sentence upon the defendant if he previously pled guilty to or was found guilty of the original charge for which probation was granted under this section; or

Order that the trial of the original charge proceed if the defendant has not previously pled or been found guilty.

Discharge and dismissal under this section shall be without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction for any purpose.

There shall be only one (1) discharge and dismissal under this section or under any similar section of the probationary statutes of any other jurisdiction.

This section shall not apply to any person holding any class of commercial driver’s license pursuant to W.S. 31-7-304(a)(i), nor to the driver of any commercial motor vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(viii), who is charged with any offense specified in W.S.

31-7-305

.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 87, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 537; C.S. 1920, § 610; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 33-1501; C.S. 1945, § 10-1803; W.S. 1957, § 7-315; Laws 1977, ch. 70, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-203; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 77, § 1; 2000, ch. 11, § 1; 2011, ch. 31, § 1; 2013 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (f).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “7-9-115” for “7-9-112” in (a)(v).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a) and in (b), substituted "thirty-six (36) months" for "five (5) years."

Cross references. —

As to presentence investigation, see Rule 32(a), W.R. Cr. P.

Section was constitutionally enacted,

in compliance with Wyo. Const., art. 3, §§ 20 and 24. Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. Nov. 9, 1990); Mollman v. State, 800 P.2d 466,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1990); Hudson v. State, 800 P.2d 471,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1990); Heggen v. State, 800 P.2d 475,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1990); Cambio v. State, 800 P.2d 482,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1990).

This section should not be invoked

in any instance in which more than one charge is being resolved. Barnes v. State, 951 P.2d 386,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1998).

Executive, not judicial, department has power to decide whether to defer prosecution

under this section. The exercise of that prosecutorial discretion is not subject to judicial review as long as any unjustifiable or suspect factors such as race, religion, or other arbitrary or discriminatory classification are not involved. Thus, the requirement that the state consent to the court's deferral of further proceedings and placement of defendants on probation without entry of a judgment of conviction does not infringe on the judicial department's sentencing power in violation of the principle of separation of powers explicitly stated in Wyo. Const., art. 2, § 1. Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. Nov. 9, 1990); Mollman v. State, 800 P.2d 466,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1990); Hudson v. State, 800 P.2d 471,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1990); Heggen v. State, 800 P.2d 475,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1990); Cambio v. State, 800 P.2d 482,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1990); Gezzi v. State, 800 P.2d 485,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1990); Kruzich v. State, 800 P.2d 489,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1990).

Prosecutor's refusal to consent to first-offender treatment did not violate due process,

where the presentence investigation report stated that the defendant had previously sold drugs but that he felt it did not amount to much, and that the state felt the pending criminal matter was not an isolated incident in view of that admission. Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. Nov. 9, 1990).

Prosecutor's refusal to consent to deferred sentence did not amount to vindictive prosecution

since it levied no additional charges against defendant and defendant was only subject to legislatively proscribed penalty which accompanied offense for which he was charged. Swanson v. State, 981 P.2d 475,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1999).

Section is probably superseded by §

7-13-302

.

Sorenson v. State, 604 P.2d 1031,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1979) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

Section was intended by legislature as permissible alternative to §

7-13-302

in limited circumstances, and it does not conflict with, and was not repealed by
§

7-13-302

.King v. State, 720 P.2d 465,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 566

(Wyo. 1986).

Section

7-13-302

is more restrictive than this section,

since that section does not itself specify the conditions of any probationary freedom.
Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

Adjudication as to each offense is essential. —

An adjudication of guilt and conviction under the statute and an adjudication as to each offense is essential to the power of the court to impose sentence. Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d 1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

Section not applicable to multi-count case. —

This section does not readily adapt to its application in a multi-count case. The legislative intent seems clear to the effect it can only be used once. Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d 1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

This section should not be invoked in any instance in which more than one charge is being resolved. Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d 1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

Discretion of court. —

The term “may” in subsection (a) connotes permissive authority and does not structure a mandatory requirement; therefore, the sentencing court has discretion with respect to invoking this section even if the defendant is eligible for its benefits and the state consents to its application. Rawson v. State, 900 P.2d 1136,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1995).

The sentencing court has discretion with respect to invoking the statute even if the defendant is eligible for its benefits. Rawson v. State, 900 P.2d 1136,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1995).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion and did not violate defendant's right to equal protection of the laws by declining to grant defendant first-offender status under this section; trial court properly denied such status in order to punish defendant for the premeditated night-time burglary and to deter other students.
Kelley v. State, 2009 WY 3, 199 P.3d 521,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2009).

Burden on defendant to show eligibility. —

This section is not available as an option when a charge against the defendant has been resolved under a similar statute or the defendant has been convicted of a felony, and the defendant must assume the burden of satisfying the sentencing court that the defendant is eligible for consideration under this section. Rawson v. State, 900 P.2d 1136,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1995).

Imposition of sentence. —

The deferred prosecution procedure provided for in this section entails more than revoking the defendant's probation; the judge must also impose a sentence for the underlying crime. Nelson v. State, 934 P.2d 1238,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1997).

Entitlement to appointed counsel. —

Although Rule 44(a)(2), W.R.Cr.P., limits the circumstances under which the court is required to appoint counsel in a probation revocation proceeding, a defendant is constitutionally entitled to court-appointed counsel in the specific circumstance when the proceeding includes sentencing. Nelson v. State, 934 P.2d 1238,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1997).

Judge may refuse probation to drunk drivers. —

The fact that a sentencing judge may perceive individuals who drink to excess, then drive and take a life, in a harsh judicial light is not such an unreasonable approach as to demonstrate an abuse of discretion in refusing to consider probation. Whitfield v. State, 781 P.2d 913,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1989).

Probation given consideration despite court's comments on “mandate” regarding drunk drivers who kill. —

Despite the trial court's comments on the “legislative mandate” regarding drunk drivers who kill, the facts surrounding the sentencing for aggravated homicide by vehicle reflected that probation was given appropriate consideration and, therefore, there was no error in sentencing the defendant to confinement. Volz v. State, 707 P.2d 179,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 581

(Wyo. 1985).

Section does not allow incarceration as condition of delayed sentence.

Laing v. State, 746 P.2d 1247,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 554

(Wyo. 1987).

Court exceeded authority when it entered order extending probation beyond original five-year period.

The court's discretion to continue probation is limited by this section to the period of five years. This period begins from the date of the “original parole” when the order is first entered which delays the passing of the sentence. King v. State, 720 P.2d 465,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 566

(Wyo. 1986).

Ten year probation illegal. —

Where the trial court was unclear as to whether its sentencing order placing the defendant on probation was decided under former § 7-13-203 (now §

7-13-301

) or former §

7-13-301

(now §

7-13-302

), yet the order took language verbatim from former § 7-13-203 and was consistent with the section by not entering and then suspending a sentence of incarceration, probation was considered granted under former § 7-13-203 and not former § 7-13-301. The court, therefore, erred and entered an illegal sentence when it sentenced the defendant to ten years probation, as the maximum period for probation allowable under former § 7-13-203 is five years. Kahlsdorf v. State, 823 P.2d 1184,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1991).

Restitution. —

Even in the absence of a statute on point, the general authority of the court to impose reasonable probation and parole conditions includes the authority to require restitution. Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d 1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

In Wyoming, once the state has established the failure of a probationer to pay restitution as ordered by the court, the probationer must establish any defense to revocation based on his alleged inability to pay. Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d 1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

In Wyoming, once the state has established the failure of a probationer to pay restitution as ordered by the court, the probationer must establish any defense to revocation based on his alleged inability to pay. Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d 1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

Court had no jurisdiction to grant annulment of conviction after sentence was imposed.

Ward v. State, 735 P.2d 707,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1987).

Revocation of probation need not be completed within period of probation. —

The court may revoke probation at any time before the final discharge of the probationer, as long as revocation proceedings are initiated within the probation period. Kahlsdorf v. State, 823 P.2d 1184,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1991) (decided under facts existing under prior law).

Second sentence of probation where first probation validly revoked. —

It does not violate the probation provisions when a defendant, having served time on probation under former § 7-13-203 (now §

7-13-301

), has her probation validly revoked and then receives a second sentence of probation under former §

7-13-301

(now §

7-13-302

) which equals the maximum sentence for her crime. Kahlsdorf v. State, 823 P.2d 1184,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1991).

Tolling of probation. —

One cannot benefit from his refusal to appear before the district court after being ordered so to do, and where defendant was aware of the proceedings instituted to revoke his probation, yet he chose to rely upon his claim of dialogue with officers of the sheriff's department in Texas, rather than consulting with the Wyoming court, the probation was tolled from the time the Petition for Order to Show Cause Why Probation Should Not Be Revoked was filed. Dickson v. State, 903 P.2d 1019,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1995).

Revocation for willful violation. —

Where the evidence showed that defendant failed to inform a probation officer of police contact during a domestic dispute, there was sufficient evidence to support a district court's decision to revoke probation; the district court was entitled to disbelieve defendant's assertion that the domestic proceeding was civil in nature and the argument that the failure to report was not willful but based on defendant's limited ability to speak English. Sami v. State, 2004 WY 23, 85 P.3d 1014,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2004).

Reinstatement of disbarred attorney. —

Attorney was
reinstated to the practice of law after being disbarred following
a criminal conviction for felony forgery, for which the attorney
was
granted first offender status, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-301

, because (1) the attorney had been allowed to seek reinstatement
in two years, (2) the attorney complied with all terms of probation,
(3) the underlying criminal case was dismissed, (4) the attorney
was
current on license fees and compliant with continuing legal education
requirements, and (5) bar counsel stipulated the attorney had the
character and fitness to practice law in Wyoming, and that the attorney's
resumption of practice would not be detrimental to the administration
of justice and the public interest. Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Barnes, 2015 WY 45, 346 P.3d 907,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2015).

Applied

in

Hicklin v. State, 535 P.2d 743,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 142

, 79 A.L.R.3d 1050 (Wyo. 1975); Weldon v. State, 800 P.2d 513,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1990); Christensen v. State, 854 P.2d 675,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1993); Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997); Jackson v. State, 2012 WY 56, 273 P.3d 1105,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Apr. 11, 2012).

Quoted

in

Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992); GGV v. JLR, 2002 WY 19, 39 P.3d 1066,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2002); Anderson v. State, 2002 WY 46, 43 P.3d 108,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2002); King v. Wyo. Dep't of Transp., 2007 WY 109, 161 P.3d 1086,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(July 12, 2007); Berger v. State, 2017 WY 90, 399 P.3d 621,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Reay v. State, 800 P.2d 499,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1990); Wetherelt v. State, 864 P.2d 449,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1993); Eustice v. State, 871 P.2d 682,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1994); Jibben v. State, 901 P.2d 1099,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1995); Garton v. State, 910 P.2d 1348,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1996); Doney v. State, 2002 WY 182, 59 P.3d 730,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. 2002); Wilkins v. State, 2005 WY 2, 104 P.3d 85,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(2005); Robison v. State, 2011 WY 4, 246 P.3d 259,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Jan. 19, 2011); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017); Greer v. Greer, 2017 WY 35, 391 P.3d 1127,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Acquittal in criminal proceeding as precluding revocation of parole on same charge, 76 ALR3d 578.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's serving part of probationary period in jail or prison, 6 ALR4th 446.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's submission to drug testing, 87 ALR4th 929.

Supreme court's views on mandatory testing for drugs or alcohol, 145 ALR Fed 335.

§ 7-13-302.
Placing person convicted on probation; suspension of imposition or execution of sentence; imposition of fine; maximum length of probation term.

After conviction, plea of no contest or plea of guilty for any offense, except crimes punishable by death or life imprisonment, and following entry of the judgment of conviction, the court may:

Suspend the imposition or execution of sentence and place the defendant on supervised or unsupervised probation; or

Impose a fine applicable to the offense and place the defendant on supervised or unsupervised probation.

Unless otherwise authorized by law, no term of probation imposed shall exceed the maximum term of imprisonment allowed by law. Any term of probation imposed under this section for a felony offense shall in no case exceed thirty-six (36) months, except that the judge may impose a term of probation that is not greater than the maximum term of imprisonment authorized by law for the offense for good cause shown upon the record and after considering public safety, rehabilitation, deterrence and any other goals of sentencing.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 91, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 10-1901; W.S. 1957, § 7-318; Laws 1969, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-301

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2019 ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 37, § 1, effective February 15, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to suspension of sentence upon conviction of driving under the influence, see §

31-5-233

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment by ch. 37, § 1, inserted "plea of no contest" following "After conviction" in (a), inserted "on supervised or unsupervised" preceding "probation" in (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Laws 2019, ch. 37, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment by ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, added (b).

Requirements for revocation of probation.—

Lower court had the authority to revoke defendant’s probation because the probation violation occurred during the probationary period in that, following defendant’s no contest plea, the court suspended the execution of defendant’s sentence in one case and placed defendant on supervised probation. Then, after defendant violated the conditions of the probationary sentence imposed in another case, the court commenced probation revocation proceedings against defendant during the period in which the execution of that sentence was suspended. Sena v. State, 2019 WY 111, 451 P.3d 1143,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2019).

Defendant was not deprived of right to speedy sentence,

where he was placed on probation without any determination of a sentence of confinement and, approximately two years later, a prison term was specified upon the revocation of his probation. The fact that the court continued to manage a lawfully imposed sentence did not equate to an unreasonable delay in sentencing. Davila v. State, 815 P.2d 848,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1991).

Section

7-13-301

is probably superseded by this section.

Sorenson v. State, 604 P.2d 1031,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1979) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

Section

7-13-301

was intended by legislature as permissible alternative to this section

in limited circumstances, and it does not conflict with, and was not repealed by this section.
King v. State, 720 P.2d 465,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 566

(Wyo. 1986).

This section is more restrictive than §

7-13-301

,

since it does not itself specify the conditions of any probationary freedom.
Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

Probation considered granted under former § 7-13-203 (now §

7-13-301

). —

Where the trial court was unclear as to whether its sentencing order placing the defendant on probation was decided under former § 7-13-203 (now §

7-13-301

) or former §

7-13-301

(now §

7-13-302

), yet the order took language verbatim from former § 7-13-203 and was consistent with the section by not entering and then suspending a sentence of incarceration, probation was considered granted under former § 7-13-203 and not former § 7-13-301. The court, therefore, erred and entered an illegal sentence when it sentenced the defendant to ten years probation, as the maximum period for probation allowable under former § 7-13-203 is five years. Kahlsdorf v. State, 823 P.2d 1184,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1991).

Court has no inherent right to grant probation.

The authority over sentencing comes from the legislature. Hicklin v. State, 535 P.2d 743,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1975).

Section is proper exercise of inherent legislative power to prohibit suspension of sentence

in a given case. Evans v. State, 655 P.2d 1214,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1982).

Imposition and revocation of probation lie in sound discretion of district court.

Jones v. State, 602 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1979); Buck v. State, 603 P.2d 878,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1979).

It is error for sentencing judge to fail to consider probation,

except for crimes punishable by death or life imprisonment. Jones v. State, 602 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1979).

Circumstances of case determine probation decision. —

The probation decision should not turn upon generalizations about types of offenses, but should be rooted in the facts and circumstances of each case. Sanchez v. State, 592 P.2d 1130,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1979).

Guidelines for consideration of probation. —

Cases from other jurisdictions, the American Bar Association (A.B.A.) Standards for Criminal Justice and Probation and Wharton's Criminal Procedure, Vol. IV, § 613 et seq. (1976) should be given proper consideration where probation is considered as an alternative to incarceration. Sanchez v. State, 592 P.2d 1130,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1979).

Upon resentencing appellant for accessory to second degree murder, the district court was directed to consider his eligibility for probation because he was subject to a minimum twenty-year sentence — a sentence less than a term of life imprisonment for purposes of this section.
Patterson v. State, 2012 WY 90, 279 P.3d 535,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2012).

Court must choose between probation and statutory range of sentence. —

A court may not assess punishment below a mandated minimum term. However, this section permits a trial court to suspend a sentence entirely and place a defendant on probation for all crimes other than those punishable by life imprisonment or death. In other words, the court cannot impose a hybrid sentence of probation and incarceration which results in a prison term below the statutory minimum, but instead must choose between probation and the statutory range of sentence provided in the applicable statute. Cook v. State, 710 P.2d 824,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 616

(Wyo. 1985).

Court does not have power to impose parole, other post-incarceration conditions, in sentence.

Sorenson v. State, 604 P.2d 1031,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1979).

In cases in which sentences are subject to the authority of the board of parole, the trial court is without authority to impose a sentence within the statutory minimum and maximum and then suspend execution of a portion of that sentence. Williams v. State, 692 P.2d 233,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 352

(Wyo. 1984).

When defendant is to be sentenced for several counts,

the court may not utilize this section in the same way that it might on sentencing for a single count. If the trial court wants to adopt a sentencing mix of imprisonment and probation, it must select a term of imprisonment and then suspend the execution of that sentence, placing the defendant on probation following any term of imprisonment. Yates v. State, 792 P.2d 187,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1990).

Where sentence is imposed on several counts, the court may not use the sentencing option outlined in this section in the same way it might on a single count. Specifically, that is not possible where a penitentiary sentence is involved, because the statute contemplates that the term of probation will begin to run immediately upon imposition of sentence. Jones v. State, 811 P.2d 284,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1991).

When defendant is to be sentenced for several counts. —

A sentence for multiple counts is proper where a specified term of imprisonment (three to nine years) would be imposed upon revocation of the term of probation, because there is no danger that punishment would increase as a result of acts underlying the revocation of parole or that vagaries of memory would interfere with the imposition of a proper sentence. Reagan v. State, 14 P.3d 925,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 2000).

Limitation of section. —

The phrase, “except crimes punishable by death or life imprisonment,” in the first sentence of this section, does not include offenses which have as a minimum sentence a term less than life and as a maximum life imprisonment. Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

Under §

6-10-201

, life sentence for fourth felony is mandatory,

and it is improper for the trial judge to consider probation.
Schuler v. State, 668 P.2d 1333,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 359

(Wyo. 1983).

Alcoholism proper ground for denial of probation. —

A judge soundly exercises his discretion when he concludes that a defendant, because of an uncured drinking problem, is in danger of further injuring the public if released and denies probation. Jones v. State, 602 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1979).

Legal to exclude probation for defendant who disappeared from jurisdiction prior to sentencing. —

Where defendant missed his scheduled sentencing date for a felony offense by inopportune disappearance from the jurisdiction and two and one-half years later he was arrested and returned, there is no legal error in a sentence of confinement which excludes probation. Weber v. State, 726 P.2d 94,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 618

(Wyo. 1986).

No right to refuse probation. —

A defendant had no right under this section, either before or after the 1987 revision of this title, to refuse a sentence of probation. Yates v. State, 792 P.2d 187,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1990).

Requirements for revocation of probation. —

All that is essential in a revocation of probation hearing is the court's conscientious judgment, after hearing the facts, that a violation has occurred. This judgment should not be an arbitrary action and should include a consideration of the reasons underlying the original imposition of conditions, the violation of these and the reasons leading to such violation. Buck v. State, 603 P.2d 878,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1979).

Recordation of reasons for probation revocation not required. —

There is no statutory or court rule or judicial requirement for the trial judge to enter into the record the reasons for his determination to revoke the probation. Buck v. State, 603 P.2d 878,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1979).

Second sentence of probation where first probation validly revoked. —

It does not violate the probation provisions when a defendant, having served time on probation under former § 7-13-203 (now §

7-13-301

), has her probation validly revoked and then receives a second sentence of probation under former §

7-13-301

(now §

7-13-302

) which equals the maximum sentence for her crime. Kahlsdorf v. State, 823 P.2d 1184,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1991).

Consecutive sentences. —

After the district court reimposed a suspended sentence of four to six years related to a failure to register as a sex offender charge, it then imposed, based upon a separate and subsequent charge of escape, a three to seven year sentence but suspended execution of the sentence in favor of probation, which was permitted under this section; it was legal for the district court to order the probationary sentence for the escape charge to be served consecutively after completion of the reimposed sentence related to the sex offender registration violation. Askin v. State, 2013 WY 162, 314 P.3d 1182,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2013).

Defendant not presumed unable to pay fine. —

Although a public defender was appointed to represent the defendant at trial because of his allegedly impecunious circumstance, the defendant was premature in his contention that the monetary penalties imposed by the court as part of his sentence were tantamount to imprisonment for failure to pay a fine. Out of an abundance of caution, trial courts usually appoint the public defender to represent an accused if he requests such representation, even if his plea of indigency is suspect. If the defendant did not pay the fine, he would have had the opportunity to show the trial court that he made a good faith effort but was unable to discharge this obligation. Hamburg v. State, 820 P.2d 523,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. Dec. 4, 1991).

Applied

in

Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Weldon v. State, 800 P.2d 513,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

Eustice v. State, 871 P.2d 682,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For note dealing with procedure for probation both before and after trial, see 7 Wyo. L.J. 104.

For article, “Disparity and the Sentencing Process in Wyoming District Courts: Recommendations for Change,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 525 (1976).

For article, “The Greatest Lawyer in the World (The Maturing of Janice Walker),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1979).

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety and effect of court's indicating to jury that court would suspend sentence, 8 ALR2d 1001.

Suspension of sentence or judgment against one convicted of conspiracy until after disposition of cases against coconspirators, 91 ALR2d 700.

Propriety of conditioning probation or suspended sentence on defendant's refraining from political activity, protest or the like, 45 ALR3d 1022.

State court's power to place defendant on probation without imposition of sentence, 56 ALR3d 932.

What constitutes “good behavior” within judicial order expressly conditioning suspension of sentence thereon, 58 ALR3d 1156.

Inherent power of court to suspend for indefinite period execution of sentence in whole or in part, 73 ALR3d 474.

Ability to pay as necessary consideration in conditioning probation or suspended sentence upon reparation or restitution, 73 ALR3d 1240.

Propriety of condition of probation which requires defendant convicted of crime of violence to make reparation to injured victim, 79 ALR3d 976.

Validity of requirement that, as condition of probation, indigent defendant reimburse defense costs, 79 ALR3d 1025.

Propriety of conditioning probation upon defendant's posting of bond guaranteeing compliance with terms of probation, 79 ALR3d 1068.

Validity of requirement that, as condition of probation, defendant submit to warrantless searches, 79 ALR3d 1083.

Propriety of conditioning probation on defendant's serving part of probationary period in jail or prison, 6 ALR4th 446.

Sentencing: permissibility of sentence to a fine only, under statutory provision for imprisonment or imprisonment and fine, 35 ALR4th 192.

Propriety, under 18 USC § 3651 (Repealed), of district court's requiring contribution of money or services to charity or to community service as condition of suspending sentence and granting probation, 66 ALR Fed 825.

§ 7-13-303.
Investigation preceding probation or suspension of sentence.

When directed by the court, the district attorney, a probation and parole agent as defined in W.S.

7-13-401

or, in the case of a minor, a counselor as defined by W.S. 5-3-501(a)(ii) or the department of family services shall investigate and report to the court in writing:

The circumstances of the offense;

The criminal record, social history and present conditions of the defendant;

If practicable, the findings of a physical and mental examination of the defendant;

If practicable, statements from the victim;

A summary of the impact of the offense on the victim;

The results of a validated risk and need assessment.

Unless the court directs otherwise, no defendant charged with a felony or misdemeanor shall be placed on probation, placed in an intensive supervision program established under W.S.

7-13-1102

or released under suspension of sentence until the report of the investigation under this section is presented to and considered by the court. If the defendant is sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections to serve a term of incarceration in a state penal institution, a copy of the report of the investigation if completed shall be sent to the department of corrections at the time of sentencing. The clerk of court shall forward copies of the report, if completed, to the department of corrections, together with copies of all orders entered by the court.

The court may, in its discretion, dispense with the investigation and preparation of a report required by this section or may limit the scope of the investigation and report to circumstances and conditions the court deems relevant to its sentencing determination.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 91, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 10-1902; W.S. 1957, § 7-319; Laws 1969, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-302

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 135, § 1; ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2011, ch. 30, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to state probation and parole officer, see § 7-13-405(b).

As to presentence investigation, see Rule 32(a), W.R. Cr. P.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “a probation and parole agent as defined in W.S.

7-13-401

” for “the state probation and parole officer.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(vi) and made related changes; and in (b), substituted "on probation, placed in an intensive supervision program established under W.S.

7-13-1102

or released" for "on probation or released."

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Sentencing recommendation not required. —

The legislature, in authorizing a presentence report, did not require a sentencing recommendation as a part of the Code of Criminal Procedure. Mehring v. State, 860 P.2d 1101,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1993).

Sentencing proper. —

District court did not abuse its discretion in denying defendant's motion to strike portions of the PSI report where, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-303

and Wyo. R. Crim. P. 32, the district court considered a variety of information and sources in imposing sentence, and did not rely on the agent's comments in imposing sentence.
Noller v. State, 2010 WY 30, 226 P.3d 867,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2010).

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-303

and Wyo. R. Crim. P. 32(a)(2), the district court did not abuse its discretion when it denied defendant's motion to strike from the PSI report the sentencing recommendations of the probation and parole agent; the PSI writer could make sentencing recommendations and such recommendations were appropriate.
Scott v. State, 2011 WY 56, 248 P.3d 1162,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2011).

Failure to attach written record. —

The failure to attach a written record of the trial court's disposition of disputed information to the presentence report requires only a limited remand; this ministerial duty may be corrected by either attaching the relevant pages from the sentencing hearing or by appending the trial court's written findings regarding the disputed information to the presentence report. Upon completion of this task, the presentence report and attachments are to be forwarded to the Department of Corrections in compliance with this section. Mehring v. State, 860 P.2d 1101,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1993).

Resentencing not required by ex parte communication. —

A judge's impropriety in reading an ex parte communication from a deputy county sheriff just prior to the sentencing hearing did not automatically require reversal and remand for resentencing by another judge, where the court stated on the record that the letter was quashed and that he would not consider it in sentencing. Coletti v. State, 769 P.2d 361,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Hackett v. State, 2010 WY 90, 233 P.3d 988,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(June 29, 2010).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Defendant's right to disclosure of presentence reports, 40 ALR3d 681.